Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1410
Funeral directing, defined.

Funeral directing means (1) counseling families or next of kin in regard to the conduct of a funeral service for a dead human body for burial, disposition, or cremation or directing or supervising burial, disposition, or cremation of dead human bodies, (2) providing for or maintaining a funeral establishment, or (3) the act of representing oneself as or using in connection with one's name the title of funeral director, mortician, or any other title implying that he or she is engaged in the business of funeral directing.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 546.